Missouri, session 2026, HB2829.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 407.028, to read as follows:
407.028. No claim brought under sections 407.010 to 407.315 shall be subject to
2 arbitration unless both parties agree to arbitration in a separate written agreement.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.